Washington statutes.
RCW 13.16.080

Allocation of budgeted funds.

In order to carry out the provisions of RCW 13.16.020 through 13.16.080 the board of county commissioners is hereby authorized, any law to the contrary notwithstanding, to allocate any funds that may be available in any item or class of the budget as presently constituted to the fund to be used to carry out the provisions of RCW 13.16.020 through 13.16.080.

[ 1945 c 188 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 2004-7.]